lexd_components/hyx-verbs_reg.lexd
##Simple regular verbs
LEXICON VerbRootE(2) 		#Class 1 երգել and 2 քաղել
ագուցել:ագուց <tv>
ազատագրել:ազատագր <tv>
ազատել:ազատ <tv>
ազդարարել:ազդարար <tv>
ազդել:ազդ <tv>
ածել:ած <tv>
ածիլել:ածիլ <tv>
մտաբերել:մտաբեր <tv> #optionally takes regular case
ակնարկել:ակնարկ <tv>
ակնկալել:ակնկալ <tv>
ահաբեկել:ահաբեկ <tv>
աղաղակել:աղաղակ <iv>
աղանձել:աղանձ <tv>
աղաչել:աղաչ <tv>
աղարտել:աղարտ <tv>
աղաւաղել:աղաւաղ <tv>
աղել:աղ <tv>
աղերսել:աղերս <tv>
աղճատել:աղճատ <tv>
աղմկել:աղմկ <tv>
աղտոտել:աղտոտ <tv>
աղօթել:աղօթ <tv>
աճապարել:աճապար <iv>
ամբաստանել:ամբաստան <tv>
ամբարել:ամբար <tv>
ամոքել:ամոք <tv>
ամպել:ամպ <iv>
ամրապնդել:ամրապնդ <tv>
ամփոփել:ամփոփ <tv>
այլանդակել:այլանդակ <tv>
այպանել:այպան <tv>
այրել:այր <tv>
այցելել:այցել <tv>
անարգել:անարգ <tv>
անգոսնել:անգոսն <tv>
անդամատել:անդամատ <tv>
անթեղել:անթեղ <tv>
անիծել:անիծ <tv>
անձնաւորել:անձնաւոր <tv>
անձրեւել:անձրեւ <iv>
անճիտել:անճիտ <tv>
անուանարկել:անուանարկ <tv>
անուանել:անուան <tv>
անպատուել:անպատու <tv>
անջատել:անջատ <tv>
անտեսել:անտես <tv>
աշակերտել:աշակերտ <tv>
աշխարել:աշխար <tv>
ապազինել:ապազին <tv>
ապականել:ապական <tv>
ապահովագրել:ապահովագր <tv>
ապահովել:ապահով <tv>
ապաշխարել:ապաշխար <iv>
ապաշխարել:ապաշխար <tv>
ապացուցել:ապացուց <tv>
ապխտել:ապխտ <tv>
ապսպրել:ապսպր <tv>
ապտակել:ապտակ <tv>
առաջադրել:առաջադր <tv>
առաջարկել:առաջարկ <tv>
առաջնորդել:առաջնորդ <tv>
առարկել:առարկ <tv>
առաքել:առաք <tv>
առեւանգել:առեւանգ <tv>
առթել:առթ <tv>
առինքնել:առինքն <tv>
առկախել:առկախ <tv>
ասեղագործել:ասեղագործ <tv>
ասպատակել:ասպատակ <tv>
աստիճանազրկել:աստիճանազրկ <tv>
ատել:ատ <tv>
արածել:արած <tv>
արատաւորել:արատաւոր <tv>
արգասաւորել:արգասաւոր <tv>
արգելակել:արգելակ <tv>
արգելափակել:արգելափակ <tv>
արգիլել:արգիլ <tv>
արդիւնաւորել:արդիւնաւոր <tv>
արդուկել:արդուկ <tv>
արժեզրկել:արժեզրկ <tv>
արժել:արժ <iv>
արժեւորել:արժեւոր <tv>
արժէքազրկել:արժէքազրկ <tv>
արժէքաւորել:արժէքաւոր <tv>
արիւնել:արիւն <tv>
արծարծել:արծարծ <tv>
արծնել:արծն <tv>
արհամարհել:արհամարհ <tv>
արձագանգել:արձագանգ <iv>
արձակել:արձակ <tv>
արձանագրել:արձանագր <tv>
արշաւել:արշաւ <iv>
արտագծել:արտագծ <tv>
արտագրել:արտագր <tv>
արտադրել:արտադր <tv>
արտածել:արտած <tv>
արտահանել:արտահան <tv>
արտայայտել:արտայայտ <tv>
արտաշնչել:արտաշնչ <iv>
արտասանել:արտասան <tv>
արտասուել:արտասու <iv>
արտատպել:արտատպ <tv>
արտաքսել:արտաքս <tv>
արտօնել:արտօն <tv>
աւաղել:աւաղ <tv>
աւանդել:աւանդ <tv>
աւարել:աւար <tv>
աւարտել:աւարտ <tv>
աւետել:աւետ <tv>
աւերել:աւեր <tv>
աւրել:աւր <tv>
աքացել:աքաց <iv>
աքսորել:աքսոր <tv>
բաբախել:բաբախ <iv>
բազմապատկել:բազմապատկ <tv>
բաժանորդագրել:բաժանորդագր <tv>
բաժնել:բաժն <tv>
բախել:բախ <tv>
բաղադրել:բաղադր <tv>
բաղդատել:բաղդատ <tv>
բամբասել:բամբաս <iv>
բանադրել:բանադր <tv>
բանաձեւել:բանաձեւ <tv>
բանսարկել:բանսարկ <iv>
բանտարկել:բանտարկ <tv>
բաշխել:բաշխ <tv>
բառաչել:բառաչ <iv>
բասրել:բասր <tv>
բարբանջել:բարբանջ <iv>
բարդել:բարդ <tv>
բարեբանել:բարեբան <tv>
բարեզարդել:բարեզարդ <tv>
բարելաւել:բարելաւ <tv>
բարեխառնել:բարեխառն <tv>
բարեխօսել:բարեխօս <iv>
բարեկարգել:բարեկարգ <tv>
բարեմաղթել:բարեմաղթ <tv>
բարենորոգել:բարենորոգ <iv>
բարեւել:բարեւ <tv>
բարձել:բարձ <tv>
բարւոքել:բարւոք <tv>
բացականչել:բացականչ <iv>
բացականչել:բացականչ <tv>
բացայայտել:բացայայտ <tv>
բացասել:բացաս <tv>
բացատրել:բացատր <tv>
բաւարարել:բաւարար <tv>
բաւել:բաւ <iv>
բեկանել:բեկան <tv>
բեկել:բեկ <tv>
բեղմնաւորել:բեղմնաւոր <tv>
բեմադրել:բեմադր <tv>
բեռնաւորել:բեռնաւոր <tv>
բեւեռել:բեւեռ <tv>
բզքտել:բզքտ <tv>
բժշկել:բժշկ <tv>
բնաջնջել:բնաջնջ <tv>
բնորոշել:բնորոշ <tv>
բնութագրել:բնութագր <tv>
բոլորել:բոլոր <tv>
բոհրել:բոհր <tv>
բողոքել:բողոք <iv>
բովանդակել:բովանդակ <tv>
բորբոքել:բորբոք <tv>
բուժել:բուժ <tv>
բուրել:բուր <tv>
բռել:բռ <tv>
բռնաբարել:բռնաբար <tv>
բռնագրաւել:բռնագրաւ <tv>
բռնադատել:բռնադատ <tv>
բռնել:բռն <tv>
բռնցքահարել:բռնցքահար <tv>
բրդել:բրդ <tv>
բրել:բր <tv>
բօթել:բօթ <tv>
գալարել:գալար <tv>
գահազրկել:գահազրկ <tv>
գահակալել:գահակալ <tv>
գահավիժել:գահավիժ <tv>
գաղթել:գաղթ <iv>
գաճել:գաճ <tv>
գամել:գամ <tv>
գայթակղել:գայթակղ <iv>
գայթել:գայթ <iv>
գանակոծել:գանակոծ <tv>
գանահարել:գանահար <tv>
գանել:գան <tv>
գանձել:գանձ <tv>
գգուել:գգու <tv>
գեղագրել:գեղագր <tv>
գեղազարդել:գեղազարդ <tv>
գեղգեղել:գեղգեղ <tv>
գերագնահատել:գերագնահատ <tv>
գերադասել:գերադաս <tv>
գերազանցել:գերազանց <tv>
գերել:գեր <tv>
գերեվարել:գերեվար <tv>
գերծել:գերծ <tv>
գերփել:գերփ <tv>
գզգզել:գզգզ <tv>
գզել:գզ <tv>
գիշատել:գիշատ <tv>
գիշերել:գիշեր <tv>
գլել:գլ <tv>
գլխատել:գլխատ <tv>
գլխաւորել:գլխաւոր <tv>
գլորել:գլոր <tv>
գլտորել:գլտոր <tv>
գծագրել:գծագր <tv>
գծել:գծ <tv>
գճել:գճ <tv>
գնահատել:գնահատ <tv>
գնդակահարել:գնդակահար <tv>
գնել:գն <tv>
գոհաբանել:գոհաբան <tv>
գոչել:գոչ <iv>
գովաբանել:գովաբան <tv>
գովել:գով <tv>
գործադրել:գործադր <tv>
գործածել:գործած <tv>
գործել:գործ <tv>
գոցել:գոց <tv>
գուժել:գուժ <tv>
գումարել:գումար <tv>
գուշակել:գուշակ <tv>
գրանցել:գրանց <tv>
գրաւագրել:գրաւագր <tv>
գրաւել:գրաւ <iv>
գրաքննել:գրաքնն <tv>
գրգռել:գրգռ <tv>
գրել:գր <tv>
գրկել:գրկ <tv>
գրոհել:գրոհ <iv>
գրպանել:գրպան <tv>
գօտեպնդել:գօտեպնդ <tv>
գօտեւորել:գօտեւոր <tv>
դակել:դակ <tv>
դայլայլել:դայլայլ <tv>
դանակահարել:դանակահար <tv>
դանդաչել:դանդաչ <iv>
դաշնաւորել:դաշնաւոր <tv>
դաշունել:դաշուն <tv>
դասախօսել:դասախօս <tv>
դասակարգել:դասակարգ <tv>
դասաւանդել:դասաւանդ <tv>
դասաւորել:դասաւոր <tv>
դասել:դաս <tv>
դաստիարակել:դաստիարակ <tv>
դատապարտել:դատապարտ <tv>
դատարկել:դատարկ <tv>
դատափետել:դատափետ <tv>
դատել:դատ <tv>
դարբնել:դարբն <tv>
դարմանել:դարման <tv>
դարովել:դարով <tv>
դաւադրել:դաւադր <tv>
դաւաճանել:դաւաճան <tv>
դաւել:դաւ <tv>
դափել:դափ <iv>
դեղել:դեղ <tv>
դիազննել:դիազնն <tv>
դիահերձել:դիահերձ <tv>
դիել:դի <tv>
դիզել:դիզ <tv>
դիմագրաւել:դիմագրաւ <tv>
դիմադարձել:դիմադարձ <tv>
դիմադրել:դիմադր <iv>
դիմակազերծել:դիմակազերծ <tv>
դիմաւորել:դիմաւոր <tv>
դիմել:դիմ <tv>
դիտել:դիտ <tv>
դիւթել:դիւթ <tv>
դղրդել:դղրդ <tv>
դողդոջել:դողդոջ <iv>
դոփել:դոփ <iv>
դրդել:դրդ <tv>
դրժել:դրժ <tv>
դրոշմել:դրոշմ <tv>
դրուատել:դրուատ <tv>
դրսեւորել:դրսեւոր <tv>
դրօշազարդել:դրօշազարդ <tv>
եզերել:եզեր <tv>
եզրափակել:եզրափակ <tv>
եղանակաւորել:եղանակաւոր <tv>
եղանակել:եղանակ <iv>
եղանակել:եղանակ <tv>
եղծանել:եղծան <tv>
եղծել:եղծ <tv>
ենթադրել:ենթադր <tv>
ենթարկել:ենթարկ <tv>
եպերել:եպեր <tv>
եռապատկել:եռապատկ <tv>
երազել:երազ <iv>
երաշխաւորել:երաշխաւոր <tv>
երգել:երգ <tv>
երեւակայել:երեւակայ <iv>
երեքնել:երեքն <tv>
երթեւեկել:երթեւեկ <iv>
երկախօսել:երկախօս <iv>
երկարաձգել:երկարաձգ <tv>
երկարել:երկար <tv>
երկնել:երկն <tv>
երկպառակել:երկպառակ <tv>
երկրորդել:երկրորդ <tv>
երկրպագել:երկրպագ <iv>
երկփեղկել:երկփեղկ <tv>
երնել:երն <tv>
երփնել:երփն <tv>
եփել:եփ <tv>
զանազանել:զանազան <tv>
զանգահարել:զանգահար <tv>
զանգել:զանգ <tv>
զառածել:զառած <tv>
զառանցել:զառանց <iv>
զատել:զատ <tv>
զարդանկարել:զարդանկար <tv>
զարդարել:զարդար <tv>
զգայռել:զգայռ <iv>
զգեստաւորել:զգեստաւոր <tv>
զգետնել:զգետն <tv>
զգլխել:զգլխ <tv>
զեկուցել:զեկուց <tv>
զեղել:զեղ <tv>
զեղծել:զեղծ <tv>
զեղչել:զեղչ <tv>
զենել:զեն <tv>
զետեղել:զետեղ <tv>
զերծել:զերծ <tv>
զինաթափել:զինաթափ <tv>
զինել:զին <tv>
զինուորագրել:զինուորագր <tv>
զմռսել:զմռս <tv>
զննել:զնն <tv>
զոհել:զոհ <tv>
զուգադրել:զուգադր <tv>
զուգակշռել:զուգակշռ <tv>
զուգակցել:զուգակց <tv>
զուգաւորել:զուգաւոր <tv>
զուգել:զուգ <tv>
զուգորդել:զուգորդ <tv>
զսպել:զսպ <tv>
զտել:զտ <tv>
զրաբանել:զրաբան <tv>
զրահաւորել:զրահաւոր <tv>
զրահել:զրահ <tv>
զրաւել:զրաւ <tv>
զրկել:զրկ <tv>
զրուցատրել:զրուցատր <tv>
զրուցել:զրուց <tv>
զրպարտել:զրպարտ <tv>
զօդել:զօդ <tv>
զօշաքաղել:զօշաքաղ <tv>
զօրել:զօր <iv>
էջադրել:էջադր <tv>
ըմբերանել:ըմբերան <tv>
ըմբոշխնել:ըմբոշխն <tv>
ըմբռնել:ըմբռն <tv>
ըմպել:ըմպ <tv>
ընդառաջել:ընդառաջ <iv>
ընդարձակել:ընդարձակ <tv>
ընդգծել:ընդգծ <tv>
ընդգրկել:ընդգրկ <tv>
ընդդիմաբանել:ընդդիմաբան <tv>
ընդդիմախօսել:ընդդիմախօս <iv>
ընդելուզել:ընդելուզ <tv>
ընդլայնել:ընդլայն <tv>
ընդհատել:ընդհատ <tv>
ընդմիջել:ընդմիջ <tv>
ընդոտնել:ընդոտն <tv>
ընդօրինակել:ընդօրինակ <tv>
ընթեռնել:ընթեռն <iv>
ընթեռնել:ընթեռն <tv>
ընթերցել:ընթերց <iv>
ընթերցել:ընթերց <tv>
ընթրել:ընթր <tv>
ընծայել:ընծայ <tv>
ընկլուզել:ընկլուզ <tv>
ընկղմել:ընկղմ <tv>
ընկճել:ընկճ <tv>
ընձեռել:ընձեռ <tv>
ընձիւղել:ընձիւղ <tv>
ընտրել:ընտր <tv>
թագադրել:թագադր <tv>
թագաւորել:թագաւոր <iv>
թաթախել:թաթախ <tv>
թաթաւել:թաթաւ <tv>
թաթխել:թաթխ <tv>
թալանել:թալան <tv>
թալլել:թալլ <tv>
թախանձել:թախանձ <tv>
թակարդել:թակարդ <tv>
թակել:թակ <tv>
թաղել:թաղ <tv>
թամբել:թամբ <tv>
թանչել:թանչ <tv>
թառանչել:թառանչ <iv>
թասել:թաս <iv>
թարգմանել:թարգման <tv>
թարթափել:թարթափ <iv>
թարթել:թարթ <iv>
թաւալել:թաւալ <tv>
թափահարել:թափահար <tv>
թափանցել:թափանց <tv>
թափել:թափ <tv>
թելադրել:թելադր <tv>
թերագնահատել:թերագնահատ <tv>
թերթել:թերթ <tv>
թեւածել:թեւած <tv>
թեւակոխել:թեւակոխ <tv>
թեւարկել:թեւարկ <tv>
թեւել:թեւ <iv>
թեքել:թեք <tv>
թիավարել:թիավար <iv>
թլփատել:թլփատ <tv>
թխել:թխ <iv>
թխել:թխ <tv>
թխմել:թխմ <tv>
թխսել:թխս <iv>
թխսել:թխս <tv>
թղթատել:թղթատ <tv>
թմբկահարել:թմբկահար <tv>
թողլքել:թողլք <tv>
թոյլատրել:թոյլատր <tv>
թոպահարել:թոպահար <tv>
թոպել:թոպ <tv>
թովել:թով <tv>
թորել:թոր <iv>
թուագրել:թուագր <tv>
թուարկել:թուարկ <tv>
թուել:թու <iv>
թունաւորել:թունաւոր <tv>
թռչկոտել:թռչկոտ <iv>
թրատել:թրատ <tv>
թրծել:թրծ <tv>
թրմել:թրմ <tv>
թրջել:թրջ <iv>
թքել:թք <tv>
թօթափել:թօթափ <tv>
թօթուել:թօթու <tv>
ժահահոտել:ժահահոտ <iv>
ժամադրել:ժամադր <tv>
ժամանել:ժաման <iv>
ժայթքել:ժայթք <iv>
ժառանգազրկել:ժառանգազրկ <tv>
ժառանգել:ժառանգ <iv>
ժխտել:ժխտ <tv>
ժողովել:ժողով <tv>
ժողվել:ժողվ <tv>
ժտել:ժտ <iv>
ժտել:ժտ <tv>
իմաստաւորել:իմաստաւոր <tv>
իշխել:իշխ <tv>
իրագործել:իրագործ <tv>
իւղել:իւղ <tv>
իւղոտել:իւղոտ <tv>
լակել:լակ <tv>
լայնել:լայն <tv>
լարել:լար <tv>
լափել:լափ <tv>
լափլիզել:լափլիզ <tv>
լզել:լզ <tv>
լզուըռտել:լզուըռտ <tv>
լիազօրել:լիազօր <tv>
լիզել:լիզ <tv>
լլկել:լլկ <tv>
լծել:լծ <tv>
լծորդել:լծորդ <tv>
լղրճել:լղրճ <tv>
լմել:լմ <tv>
լնդել:լնդ <tv>
լոլոզել:լոլոզ <tv>
լուել:լու <tv>
լուծել:լուծ <tv>
լուսաբանել:լուսաբան <tv>
լուսազարդել:լուսազարդ <tv>
լուսանկարել:լուսանկար <tv>
լուսաւորել:լուսաւոր <tv>
լուսնել:լուսն <iv>
լպրծել:լպրծ <tv>
լռել:լռ <tv>
լսել:լս <tv>
լրտեսել:լրտես <tv>
լփռտել:լփռտ <iv>
լքել:լք <tv>
խաբել:խաբ <tv>
խազել:խազ <tv>
խաթարել:խաթար <tv>
խախալել:խախալ <tv>
խախանջել:խախանջ <iv>
խախտել:խախտ <tv>
խահագործել:խահագործ <tv>
խաղաղել:խաղաղ <tv>
խայթել:խայթ <tv>
խայտառակել:խայտառակ <tv>
խանգարել:խանգար <tv>
խանդավառել:խանդավառ <tv>
խանծել:խանծ <tv>
խանձել:խանձ <tv>
խանչել:խանչ <iv>
խաշել:խաշ <tv>
խաչակնքել:խաչակնք <iv>
խաչաձեւել:խաչաձեւ <tv>
խաչել:խաչ <tv>
խառատել:խառատ <tv>
խառել:խառ <tv>
խառնակել:խառնակ <tv>
խառնել:խառն <tv>
խարազանել:խարազան <tv>
խարանել:խարան <tv>
խարբալել:խարբալ <tv>
խարդախել:խարդախ <tv>
խարել:խար <tv>
խարխափել:խարխափ <tv>
խարխլել:խարխլ <tv>
խարկել:խարկ <tv>
խարշափել:խարշափ <iv>
խարսխել:խարսխ <tv>
խարտել:խարտ <tv>
խափանել:խափան <tv>
խեթել:խեթ <tv>
խեթկել:խեթկ <tv>
խեղաթիւրել:խեղաթիւր <tv>
խեղդել:խեղդ <tv>
խեղել:խեղ <tv>
խզել:խզ <tv>
խթանել:խթան <tv>
խթել:խթ <tv>
խիզախել:խիզախ <iv>
խլել:խլ <tv>
խլրտել:խլրտ <tv>
խխնջել:խխնջ <iv>
խծբծել:խծբծ <tv>
խճողել:խճող <tv>
խմբագրել:խմբագր <tv>
խմբաւորել:խմբաւոր <tv>
խմբել:խմբ <tv>
խմել:խմ <tv>
խմորել:խմոր <tv>
խնամել:խնամ <tv>
խնայել:խնայ <tv>
խնդրել:խնդր <tv>
խնկարկել:խնկարկ <tv>
խնկել:խնկ <tv>
խնջել:խնջ <tv>
խոզանակել:խոզանակ <tv>
խոթել:խոթ <tv>
խոխոջել:խոխոջ <iv>
խողխողել:խողխող <tv>
խոնարհել:խոնարհ <tv>
խոշտանգել:խոշտանգ <tv>
խոպոպել:խոպոպ <tv>
խոռել:խոռ <tv>
խոտել:խոտ <tv>
խորաչափել:խորաչափ <tv>
խորել:խոր <tv>
խորխատել:խորխատ <tv>
խորհրդածել:խորհրդած <iv>
խորհրդածել:խորհրդած <tv>
խորհրդանշել:խորհրդանշ <iv>
խորշոմել:խորշոմ <iv>
խորովել:խորով <tv>
խորտակել:խորտակ <tv>
խոցել:խոց <tv>
խոցոտել:խոցոտ <tv>
խուզարկել:խուզարկ <tv>
խուզել:խուզ <tv>
խուժել:խուժ <tv>
խուսել:խուս <iv>
խուրտել:խուրտ <tv>
խռնել:խռն <tv>
խռովել:խռով <tv>
խտղտել:խտղտ <tv>
խտրել:խտր <tv>
խրախուսել:խրախուս <tv>
խրատել:խրատ <tv>
խրել:խր <tv>
խրխնջել:խրխնջ <iv>
խցանել:խցան <tv>
խցել:խց <tv>
խփել:խփ <tv>
ծալել:ծալ <tv>
ծալլել:ծալլ <tv>
ծախել:ծախ <tv>
ծածկել:ծածկ <tv>
ծականշել:ծականշ <tv>
ծակել:ծակ <tv>
ծակծկել:ծակծկ <tv>
ծակոտել:ծակոտ <tv>
ծաղկազարդել:ծաղկազարդ <tv>
ծաղկել:ծաղկ <iv>
ծաղկել:ծաղկ <tv>
ծաղրել:ծաղր <tv>
ծամածռել:ծամածռ <tv>
ծամել:ծամ <tv>
ծամծմել:ծամծմ <tv>
ծայրատել:ծայրատ <tv>
ծանակել:ծանակ <tv>
ծանուցել:ծանուց <tv>
ծանրաբեռնել:ծանրաբեռն <tv>
ծանօթագրել:ծանօթագր <tv>
ծառազարդել:ծառազարդ <tv>
ծառայել:ծառայ <tv>
ծարիրել:ծարիր <tv>
ծարուրել:ծարուր <tv>
ծաւալել:ծաւալ <tv>
